Texas, session 891, SB40.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  DEFINITIONS. In this Act: (1)  "Digital court reporting" means the act of making a verbatim record of an oral court proceeding, deposition, or proceeding before a grand jury, referee, or court commissioner for use in litigation in the courts of this state through the use of digital technology, electronic recording equipment, or other recording and transcribing technology. (2)  "Office" means the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System. SECTION 2.  DIGITAL COURT REPORTING STUDY. The office shall conduct a study on digital court reporting, including: (1)  an evaluation of the current use of digital court reporting in the courts of this state, including the cost, access, accuracy, and effectiveness of digital court reporting; (2)  an analysis of the use of digital court reporting in other states and jurisdictions; and (3)  recommendations on necessary legislative changes regarding the use of digital court reporting in this state. SECTION 3.  REPORT. Not later than October 1, 2026, the office shall submit a report on the study conducted under this Act to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and appropriate standing committees of the legislature. SECTION 4.  EXPIRATION. This Act expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 5.  EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.